Maryland, session 2025, SB0828.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–104.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SENSITIVE LOCATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 6–111 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A STATE OR LOCAL
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(2) A PUBLIC SCHOOL, A PUBLIC LIBRARY, OR A UNIT OF THE
EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT THAT OPERATES AT A SENSITIVE
LOCATION SHALL DENY ACCESS TO ANY PORTION OF THE SENSITIVE LOCATION THAT
IS NOT ACCESSIBLE TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC TO ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SEEKING
ACCESS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENFORCING FEDERAL IMMIGRATION LAW, UNLESS:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL PRESENTS A VALID WARRANT ISSUED BY A
FEDERAL COURT OR A COURT OF THE STATE; OR
(II) EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES EXIST.
Article – State Government
6–111.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SENSITIVE LOCATION” MEANS:
(1) A SCHOOL, INCLUDING A PRESCHOOL, PRIMARY OR SECONDARY
SCHOOL, VOCATIONAL OR TRADE SCHOOL, OR COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY;
(2) A MEDICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH CARE FACILITY, INCLUDING A
HOSPITAL, A DOCTOR’S OFFICE, A HEALTH CLINIC, A VACCINATION OR TESTING
SITE, AN URGENT CARE CENTER, A SITE THAT SERVES PREGNANT INDIVIDUALS, OR
A COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER;
(3) A PLACE OF WORSHIP OR RELIGIOUS STUDY, WHETHER IN A
STRUCTURE DEDICATED TO ACTIVITIES OF FAITH OR A TEMPORARY FACILITY OR
LOCATION WHERE ACTIVITIES OF FAITH ARE TAKING PLACE;

SENATE BILL 828 3
(4) A PLACE WHERE CHILDREN GATHER, INCLUDING A PLAYGROUND,
RECREATION CENTER, CHILD CARE CENTER, BEFORE– OR AFTER–SCHOOL CARE
CENTER, FOSTER CARE FACILITY, GROUP HOME FOR CHILDREN, OR SCHOOL BUS
STOP;
(5) A SOCIAL SERVICES ESTABLISHMENT, INCLUDING A CRISIS
CENTER, DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER, VICTIMS SERVICES CENTER, CHILD
ADVOCACY CENTER, SUPERVISED VISITATION CENTER, FAMILY JUSTICE CENTER,
COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION, FACILITY THAT SERVES DISABLED PERSONS,
HOMELESS SHELTER, DRUG OR ALCOHOL COUNSELING AND TREATMENT FACILITY,
OR FOOD BANK OR PANTRY OR OTHER ESTABLISHMENT DISTRIBUTING FOOD OR
OTHER ESSENTIALS OF LIFE TO PEOPLE IN NEED;
(6) A PLACE WHERE DISASTER OR EMERGENCY RESPONSE AND
RELIEF IS BEING PROVIDED, INCLUDING ALONG EVACUATION ROUTES, WHERE
SHELTER OR EMERGENCY SUPPLIES, FOOD, OR WATER ARE BEING DISTRIBUTED, OR
REGISTRATION FOR DISASTER–RELATED ASSISTANCE OR FAMILY REUNIFICATION IS
UNDERWAY;
(7) A PLACE WHERE A FUNERAL, GRAVESIDE CEREMONY, ROSARY,
WEDDING, OR OTHER RELIGIOUS OR CIVIL CEREMONY OR OBSERVANCE OCCURS;
(8) A PLACE WHERE THERE IS AN ONGOING PARADE,
DEMONSTRATION, OR RALLY;
(9) A COURTHOUSE; OR
(10) ANY OTHER LOCATION DESIGNATED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL.
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, IN CONSULTATION WITH
APPROPRIATE STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL DEVELOP GUIDELINES FOR ENTITIES
OPERATING AT SENSITIVE LOCATIONS THAT LIMIT IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT
SENSITIVE LOCATIONS TO THE FULLEST EXTENT POSSIBLE CONSISTENT WITH
FEDERAL AND STATE LAW.
(2) A STATE AGENCY THAT OPERATES AT A SENSITIVE LOCATION
SHALL:
(I) ADOPT POLICIES CONSISTENT WITH THE GUIDELINES
DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; OR

SENATE BILL 828
(II) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OF
THE AGENCY’S DECISION NOT TO ADOPT POLICIES CONSISTENT WITH THE
GUIDELINES DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING:
1. AN EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR NOT
ADOPTING POLICIES; AND
2. COPIES OF ANY EXISTING POLICIES RELATING TO
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT THE SENSITIVE LOCATION.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SENSITIVE LOCATION” MEANS:
(1) A PUBLIC SCHOOL;
(2) A PUBLIC LIBRARY;
(3) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY OPERATED BY A UNIT OF STATE
GOVERNMENT;
(4) A FACILITY OPERATED BY THE COMPTROLLER;
(5) A COURTHOUSE; OR
(6) ANY OTHER LOCATION THAT:
(I) PROVIDES STATE–FUNDED SERVICES RELATED TO:
1. PHYSICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH;
2. EDUCATION; OR
3. SHELTER CARE; AND
(II) AS DETERMINED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, REQUIRES
SPECIAL CONSIDERATION FOR IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES.
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH
GUIDANCE REGARDING IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT SENSITIVE LOCATIONS
THAT INFORMS THE PUBLIC AND RELEVANT STATE AGENCIES ABOUT:
(I) THE LIMITATIONS ON FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES AT SENSITIVE LOCATIONS; AND
(II) THE RESPONSIBILITIES AND RESTRICTIONS ON STATE
AGENCIES THAT AFFECT THE AGENCIES’ ABILITY TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH

SENATE BILL 828 5
FEDERAL AND STATE LAW WHILE MAINTAINING PUBLIC SAFETY AND
ACCESSIBILITY.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH GUIDANCE
REGARDING THE RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF INDIVIDUALS WHO INTERACT
WITH FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT PERSONNEL ACTING TO ENFORCE FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION LAW.
(D) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL, PUBLIC
LIBRARY, AND UNIT OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT THAT
OPERATES AT A SENSITIVE LOCATION SHALL IMPLEMENT A POLICY CONSISTENT
WITH THE GUIDANCE ISSUED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) THE GUIDANCE AND POLICIES REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION ARE NOT
SUBJECT TO TITLE 10, SUBTITLES 1, 2, AND 3 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted shall take effect June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.